Hawaii statutes.
[§98-6] Effect of authentication. (a)
Legal material in an electronic record that is authenticated under section 98-5
is presumed to be an accurate copy of the legal material.

(b) If another state has adopted a law
substantially similar to this chapter, legal material in an electronic record
that is designated as official and authenticated by the official publisher in
that state is presumed to be an accurate copy of the legal material.

(c) A party contesting the authentication of
legal material in an electronic record authenticated under section 98-5 has the
burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the record is not
authentic. [L 2013, c 11, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next